Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4022
Board; members; terms; vacancy.

The board shall consist of five or more members to serve such terms as the city council, by resolution, determines. The mayor, with the approval of the city council, shall fill any vacancy for the term vacated. A board member may serve more than one term. The board shall select from its members a chairperson and a secretary.

Laws 1979, LB 251, § 8.